Ohio, session 136, SB298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4928.67 be amended and sections 6
4928.675, 4928.676, 4928.677, 4928.678, 4928.679, 4928.6710, and 7
4928.6711 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 8
Sec. 4928.67. (A)(1) Except as provided in division 9
divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section, an electric utility 10
shall develop a standard contract or tariff providing for net 11
metering. 12
That contract or tariff shall be identical in rate 13
structure, all retail rate components, and any monthly charges 14
to the contract or tariff to which the same customer would be 15
assigned if that customer were not a customer-generator. 16
(2) An electric utility shall also develop a separate 17
standard contract or tariff providing for net metering for a 18
hospital, as defined in section 3701.01 of the Revised Code, 19
that is also a customer-generator, subject to all of the 20

S. B. No. 298 Page 2
As Introduced
following: 21
(a) No limitation, including that in divisions (A)(31)(a) 22
and (d) of section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, shall apply 23
regarding the availability of the contract or tariff to such 24
hospital customer-generators. 25
(b) The contract or tariff shall be based both upon the 26
rate structure, rate components, and any charges to which the 27
hospital would otherwise be assigned if the hospital were not a 28
customer-generator and upon the market value of the customer- 29
generated electricity at the time it is generated. 30
(c) The contract or tariff shall allow the hospital 31
customer-generator to operate its electric generating facilities 32
individually or collectively without any wattage limitation on 33
size. 34
(3) An electric utility shall also develop a separate 35
standard contract or tariff providing for net metering for a 36
mercantile customer that is also a customer-generator, subject 37
to all of the following: 38
(a) The contract or tariff shall be based upon the rate 39
structure, rate components, and any charges to which the 40
mercantile customer would otherwise be assigned if the 41
mercantile customer was not a customer-generator, except for the 42
customer's transmission rate structure, transmission rate 43
components, and transmission charges. 44
(b) The contract or tariff shall have the option for the 45
mercantile customer's transmission service costs to be billed 46
and collected by the mercantile customer's competitive retail 47
electric service supplier instead of by the mercantile 48
customer's electric utility. 49

S. B. No. 298 Page 3
As Introduced
(c) The capacity of the mercantile customer's net metering 50
system is less than fifty megawatts. 51
(B)(1) Net metering under this section shall be 52
accomplished using a single meter capable of registering the 53
flow of electricity in each direction. If its existing 54
electrical meter is not capable of measuring the flow of 55
electricity in two directions, the customer-generator shall be 56
responsible for all expenses involved in purchasing and 57
installing a meter that is capable of measuring electricity flow 58
in two directions. 59
(2) The electric utility, at its own expense and with the 60
written consent of the customer-generator, may install one or 61
more additional meters to monitor the flow of electricity in 62
each direction. 63
(3) Consistent with the other provisions of this section, 64
the measurement of net electricity supplied or generated shall 65
be calculated in the following manner: 66
(a) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity 67
produced or consumed during the billing period, in accordance 68
with normal metering practices. 69
(b) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility 70
exceeds the electricity generated by the customer-generator and 71
fed back to the utility during the billing period, the customer- 72
generator shall be billed for the net electricity supplied by 73
the utility, in accordance with normal metering practices. If 74
electricity is provided to the utility, the credits for that 75
electricity shall appear in the next billing cycle. 76
(4) A net metering system used by a customer-generator 77
shall meet all applicable safety and performance standards 78

S. B. No. 298 Page 4
As Introduced
established by the national electrical code, the institute of 79
electrical and electronics engineers, and underwriters 80
laboratories. 81
(C) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules 82
relating to additional control and testing requirements for 83
customer-generators that the commission determines are necessary 84
to protect public and worker safety and system reliability. 85
(D) An electric utility shall not require a customer- 86
generator whose net metering system meets the standards and 87
requirements provided for in divisions (B)(4) and (C) of this 88
section to do any of the following: 89
(1) Comply with additional safety or performance 90
standards; 91
(2) Perform or pay for additional tests; 92
(3) Purchase additional liability insurance. 93
Sec. 4928.675. As used in sections 4928.675 to 4928.6711 94
of the Revised Code: 95
(A) "Virtual net metering" means measuring the difference 96
in an applicable billing period between the electricity supplied 97
by an electric utility and the electricity from a virtual net 98
metering system attributed to a virtual net metering customer 99
that is fed to the electric utility. 100
(B) "Virtual net metering customer" means a person, 101
including a hospital as defined in section 3701.01 of the 102
Revised Code, that contracts for or otherwise acquires 103
electricity generated by a virtual net metering system. "Virtual 104
net metering customer" does not include a residential customer. 105
(C) "Virtual net metering system" means a facility that 106

S. B. No. 298 Page 5
As Introduced
satisfies all of the requirements of section 4928.676 of the 107
Revised Code. 108
Sec. 4928.676. A virtual net metering system shall satisf y 109
all of the following: 110
(A) The system is a facility for the production of 111
electrical energy. 112
(B)(1) The system, subject to divisions (B)(2) and (3) of 113
this section, uses as its fuel either solar, wind, biomass, 114
landfill gas, or hydropower, or uses a microturbine, natural 115
gas-fired generator, battery-storage system, or a fuel cell. 116
(2) If the system uses either a battery-storage system or 117
natural gas-fired generator, then the battery-storage system or 118
generator shall not be sized so as to exceed the size of any co- 119
located facility using solar, wind, biomass, landfill gas, or 120
hydropower as its fuel. 121
(3) If the system uses both a battery-storage system and 122
natural gas-fired generator, then the combined nameplate 123
capacity of the system and the generator shall not be sized so 124
as to exceed the size of any co-located facility using solar, 125
wind, biomass, landfill gas, or hydropower as its fuel. 126
(C) The system is not a net metering system. 127
(D) The system is not located on agricultural land as 128
defined in section 901.61 of the Revised Code. 129
(E) The system is located on one of the following: 130
(1) A mine as defined in section 1561.01 of the Revised 131
Code; 132
(2) A brownfield as defined in section 122.6511 of the 133

S. B. No. 298 Page 6
As Introduced
Revised Code; 134
(3) A site, location, tract of land, installation, or 135
building for incineration, composting, sanitary landfilling, or 136
other approved methods of disposal of solid wastes as defined in 137
section 3734.01 of the Revised Code; 138
(4) Property owned by a county land reutilization 139
corporation as defined in section 1724.01 of the Revised Code; 140
(5) A disposal system as defined in section 6111.01 of the 141
Revised Code; 142
(6) The roof of a facility that is used exclusively for 143
commercial or industrial purposes. 144
(F) The system is in the certified territory of the 145
electric utility that provides electric service to all electric 146
meters that the virtual net metering customer intends to 147
attribute electricity to or aggregate with under section 148
4928.6710 of the Revised Code. 149
(G) The system operates in parallel with the electric 150
utility's transmission and distribution facilities. 151
(H) The system is sized so as to not exceed one hundred 152
twenty per cent of the customer's requirements for electricity 153
at the time of interconnection, as determined pursuant to 154
section 4928.678 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the 155
customer intends to take service through an electric utility or 156
a competitive retail electric service provider. 157
(I) The virtual net metering customer maintains an 158
electric meter where the system is located. 159
(J) The system serves exactly one virtual net metering 160
customer. 161

S. B. No. 298 Page 7
As Introduced
Sec. 4928.677. A virtual net metering system may be 162
located on the same site as one or more other virtual net 163
metering systems. 164
Sec. 4928.678. (A) The electric utility shall communicate 165
with and assist a virtual net metering customer or person 166
interested in becoming a virtual net metering customer in 167
calculating the customer's or prospective customer's 168
requirements for electricity based on both of the following: 169
(1) The average amount of electricity supplied by the 170
electric utility to the customer annually over the previous 171
three years; 172
(2) The average amount of electricity supplied by the 173
electric utility in any hour within the previous three years, 174
including during electric system coincidental peak hours. 175
(B) In instances in which the electric utility cannot 176
provide data without divulging confidential or proprietary 177
information, or in circumstances in which the electric utility 178
does not have the data or cannot calculate the requirements for 179
electricity described in division (A) of this section due to new 180
construction, vacant properties, facility expansions, or other 181
unique circumstances, the electric utility shall use any 182
available consumption data or measures to establish an 183
appropriate consumption estimate. 184
(C) Upon request from any virtual net metering customer or 185
person interested in becoming a virtual net metering customer, 186
the electric utility shall provide or make available to the 187
customer or prospective customer either the average electricity 188
supplied and coincident peak power to the customer over the 189
previous three years or a reasonable consumption estimate for 190

S. B. No. 298 Page 8
As Introduced
the customer. 191
Sec. 4928.679. (A)(1) An electric utility shall develop a 192
standard contract or tariff providing for virtual net metering. 193
The contract or tariff shall be similar in rate structure, all 194
retail rate components, and any monthly charges to the contract 195
or tariff to which the same customer would be assigned if that 196
customer was not a virtual net metering customer, except for the 197
customer's transmission rate structure, transmission rate 198
components, and transmission charges. The contract or tariff 199
shall provide that any credit for electricity supplied or 200
generated by the virtual net metering system applies only to the 201
generation and transmission charges imposed on the virtual net 202
metering customer, and the virtual net metering customer shall 203
be billed for all distribution related charges. 204
(2) The contract or tariff providing for virtual net 205
metering shall have the option for the mercantile customer's 206
transmission service costs to be billed and collected by the 207
mercantile customer's competitive retail electric service 208
supplier instead of by the mercantile customer's electric 209
utility. 210
(B) Consistent with the other provisions of this section, 211
the measurement of net electricity supplied or generated for 212
virtual net metering shall be calculated in the following 213
manner: 214
(1) The electric utility shall measure the amount of 215
electricity generated by the virtual net metering system and 216
attributed to the virtual net metering customer during the 217
billing period. 218
(2) The electric utility shall measure the amount of 219

S. B. No. 298 Page 9
As Introduced
electricity consumed by the virtual net metering customer during 220
the billing period. 221
(3) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity 222
produced or consumed during the billing period using the 223
difference between the amounts measured in divisions (B)(1) and 224
(2) of this section, in accordance with normal metering 225
practices. 226
(C) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility 227
exceeds the electricity generated by the virtual net metering 228
system attributed to the virtual net metering customer and fed 229
to the utility during the billing period, the virtual net 230
metering customer shall be billed for the net electricity 231
supplied by the utility, in accordance with normal metering 232
practices. 233
(D) If the electric utility receives more electricity from 234
the virtual net metering customer than the utility supplied to 235
the customer during the billing period, the excess electricity 236
generated shall be converted to a monetary credit equivalent to 237
the value of all standard charges associated with transmission, 238
whether based in kilowatt hours or kilowatts, other than 239
disaster recovery fees approved by the public utilities 240
commission, and all standard charges associated with generation 241
of the electric utility's standard service offer and shall carry 242
forward as a monetary credit on the customer's future bills 243
until applied completely against the customer's charges. The 244
monetary credit shall not exceed generation and transmission 245
savings realized by the electric utility. The monetary credit 246
shall be applied only to the generation and transmission 247
portions of the virtual net metering customer's bills. The 248
electric utility shall not be required to pay the monetary 249

S. B. No. 298 Page 10
As Introduced
credit, other than to credit it to future bills, and the 250
monetary credit may be lost if a virtual net metering customer 251
does not use the credit or stops taking service from the 252
electric utility. 253
(E) A virtual net metering system shall meet all 254
applicable safety and performance standards established by the 255
national electrical code, the institute of electrical and 256
electronics engineers, and underwriters laboratories. 257
(F) An electric utility shall not require a virtual net 258
metering customer or other person who owns a virtual net 259
metering system that meets the standards and requirements 260
provided for in division (E) of this section and in section 261
4928.6711 of the Revised Code to do any of the following: 262
(1) Comply with additional safety or performance 263
standards; 264
(2) Perform or pay for additional tests; 265
(3) Purchase additional liability insurance. 266
(G) No residential customer shall be required to incur any 267
costs or be charged, directly or indirectly, for any costs 268
related to virtual net metering. 269
Sec. 4928.6710. A virtual net metering customer may 270
aggregate any or all of the customer's electric meters that are 271
in the same electric utility certified territory as a virtual 272
net metering system where the electricity generated by the 273
system is attributable to the customer. 274
Sec. 4928.6711. The public utilities commission shall 275
adopt rules to administer virtual net metering and meter 276
aggregation under sections 4928.675 to 4928.6710 of the Revised 277

S. B. No. 298 Page 11
As Introduced
Code, including rules relating to additional control and testing 278
requirements for virtual net metering systems that the 279
commission determines are necessary to protect public and worker 280
safety and system reliability. 281
Section 2. That existing section 4928.67 of the Revised 282
Code is hereby repealed. 283